California statutes. Penal Code
 shall be provided to the batterer’s program if it is requested. The probation department shall also determine which community programs the defendant would benefit from and which of those programs would accept the defendant. The probation department shall report its findings and recommendations to the court.

(2) The court shall advise the defendant that the failure to report to the probation department for the initial investigation, as directed by the court, or the failure to enroll in a specified program, as directed by the court or the probation department, shall result in possible further incarceration. The court, in the interests of justice, may relieve the defendant from the prohibition set forth in this subdivision based upon the defendant’s mistake or excusable neglect. Application for this relief shall be filed within 20 court days
 of the missed deadline. This time limitation may not be extended. A copy of any application for relief shall be served on the office of the prosecuting attorney.

(3) After the court orders the defendant to a batterer’s program, the probation department shall conduct an initial assessment of the defendant, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Social, economic, and family background.

(B) Education.

(C) Vocational achievements.

(D) Criminal history.

(E) Medical history.

(F) Substance abuse history.

(G) Consultation with the probation officer.

(H) Verbal consultation with the victim, only if the victim desires to participate.

(I) Assessment of the future probability of the defendant committing murder.

(4) The probation department shall attempt to notify the victim regarding the requirements for the defendant’s participation in the batterer’s program, as well as regarding available victim resources. The victim also shall be informed that attendance in any program does not guarantee that an abuser will not be violent.

(c) The court or the probation department
 shall refer defendants only to batterer’s programs that follow standards outlined in paragraph (1), which may include, but are not limited to, lectures, classes, group discussions, and counseling. The probation department shall design and implement an approval and renewal process for batterer’s programs and shall solicit input from criminal justice agencies and domestic violence victim advocacy programs.

(1) The goal of a batterer’s program under this section shall be to stop domestic violence. A batterer’s program shall consist of the following components:

(A) Strategies to hold the defendant accountable for the violence in a relationship, including, but not limited to, providing the defendant with a written statement that the defendant shall be held accountable for acts or
 threats of domestic violence.

(B) A requirement that the defendant participate in ongoing same-gender group sessions.

(C) An initial intake that provides written definitions to the defendant of physical, emotional, sexual, economic, and verbal abuse, and the techniques for stopping these types of abuse.

(D) Procedures to inform the victim regarding the requirements for the defendant’s participation in the intervention program as well as regarding available victim resources. The victim also shall be informed that attendance in any program does not guarantee that an abuser will not be violent.

(E) A requirement that the defendant attend group sessions free of
 chemical influence.

(F) Educational programming that examines, at a minimum, gender roles, socialization, the nature of violence, the dynamics of power and control, and the effects of abuse on children and others.

(G) A requirement that excludes any couple counseling or family counseling, or both.

(H) Procedures that give the program the right to assess whether or not the defendant would benefit from the program and to refuse to enroll the defendant if it is determined that the defendant would not benefit from the program, so long as the refusal is not because of the defendant’s inability to pay. If possible, the program shall suggest an appropriate alternative program.

(I) Program staff who, to the extent possible, have specific knowledge regarding, but not limited to, spousal abuse, child abuse, sexual abuse, substance abuse, the dynamics of violence and abuse, the law, and procedures of the legal system.

(J) Program staff who are encouraged to utilize the expertise, training, and assistance of local domestic violence centers.

(K) A requirement that the defendant enter into a written agreement with the program, which shall include an outline of the contents of the program, the attendance requirements, the requirement to attend group sessions free of chemical influence, and a statement that the defendant may be removed from the program if it is determined that the defendant is not benefiting from the program or is disruptive to the
 program.

(L) A requirement that the defendant sign a confidentiality statement prohibiting disclosure of any information obtained through participating in the program or during group sessions regarding other participants in the program.

(M) Program content that provides cultural and ethnic sensitivity.

(N) A requirement of a written referral from the court or probation department prior to permitting the defendant to enroll in the program. The written referral shall state the number of minimum sessions required by the court.

(O) Procedures for submitting to the probation department all of the following uniform written responses:

(i) Proof of enrollment, to be submitted to the court and the probation department and to include the fee determined to be charged to the defendant, based upon the ability to pay, for each session.

(ii) Periodic progress reports that include attendance, fee payment history, and program compliance.

(iii) Final evaluation that includes the program’s evaluation of the defendant’s progress, using the criteria set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a), and recommendation for either successful or unsuccessful termination or continuation in the program.

(P) A sliding fee schedule based on the defendant’s ability to pay. The batterer’s
 program shall develop and utilize a sliding fee scale that recognizes both the defendant’s ability to pay and the necessity of programs to meet overhead expenses. An indigent defendant may negotiate a deferred payment schedule, but shall pay a nominal fee, if the defendant has the ability to pay the nominal fee. Upon a hearing and a finding by the court that the defendant does not have the financial ability to pay the nominal fee, the court shall waive this fee. The payment of the fee shall be made a condition of probation if the court determines the defendant has the present ability to pay the fee. The fee shall be paid during the term of probation unless the program sets other conditions. The acceptance policies shall be in accordance with the scaled fee system.

(2) The court shall refer persons only to batterer’s programs that have
 been approved by the probation department pursuant to paragraph (5). The probation department shall do both of the following:

(A) Provide for the issuance of a provisional approval, provided that the applicant is in substantial compliance with applicable laws and regulations and an urgent need for approval exists. A provisional approval shall be considered an authorization to provide services and shall not be considered a vested right.

(B) If the probation department determines that a program is not in compliance with standards set by the department, the department shall provide written notice of the noncompliant areas to the program. The program shall submit a written plan of corrections within 14 days from the date of the written notice on noncompliance. A plan of correction
 shall include, but not be limited to, a description of each corrective action and timeframe for implementation. The department shall review and approve all or any part of the plan of correction and notify the program of approval or disapproval in writing. If the program fails to submit a plan of correction or fails to implement the approved plan of correction, the department shall consider whether to revoke or suspend approval and, upon revoking or suspending approval, shall have the option to cease referrals of defendants under this section.

(3) No program, regardless of its source of funding, shall be approved unless it meets all of the following standards:

(A) The establishment of guidelines and criteria for education services, including standards of services that may include
 lectures, classes, and group discussions.

(B) Supervision of the defendant for the purpose of evaluating the person’s progress in the program.

(C) Adequate reporting requirements to ensure that all persons who, after being ordered to attend and complete a program, may be identified for either failure to enroll in, or failure to successfully complete, the program or for the successful completion of the program as ordered. The program shall notify the court and the probation department, in writing, within the period of time and in the manner specified by the court of any person who fails to complete the program. Notification shall be given if the program determines that the defendant is performing unsatisfactorily or if the defendant is not benefiting from the education,
 treatment, or counseling.

(D) No victim shall be compelled to participate in a program or counseling, and no program may condition a defendant’s enrollment on participation by the victim.

(4) In making referrals of indigent defendants to approved batterer’s programs, the probation department shall apportion these referrals evenly among the approved programs.

(5) The probation department shall have the sole authority to approve a batterer’s program for probation. The program shall be required to obtain only one approval but shall renew that approval annually.

(A) The procedure for the approval of a new or existing program shall include all of the
 following:

(i) The completion of a written application containing necessary and pertinent information describing the applicant program.

(ii) The demonstration by the program that it possesses adequate administrative and operational capability to operate a batterer’s treatment program. The program shall provide documentation to prove that the program has conducted batterer’s programs for at least one year prior to application. This requirement may be waived under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) if there is no existing batterer’s program in the city, county, or city and county.

(iii) The onsite review of the program, including monitoring of a session to determine that the program adheres to applicable statutes and
 regulations.

(iv) The payment of the approval fee.

(B) The probation department shall fix a fee for approval not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and for approval renewal not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) every year in an amount sufficient to cover its costs in administering the approval process under this section. No fee shall be charged for the approval of local governmental entities.

(C) The probation department has the sole authority to approve the issuance, denial, suspension, or revocation of approval and to cease new enrollments or referrals to a batterer’s program under this section. The probation department shall review information relative to a program’s performance or failure to
 adhere to standards, or both. The probation department may suspend or revoke an approval issued under this subdivision or deny an application to renew an approval or to modify the terms and conditions of approval, based on grounds established by probation, including, but not limited to, either of the following:

(i) Violation of this section by any person holding approval or by a program employee in a program under this section.

(ii) Misrepresentation of any material fact in obtaining the approval.

(6) For defendants who are chronic users or serious abusers of drugs or alcohol, standard components in the program shall include concurrent counseling for substance abuse and violent behavior, and in appropriate cases,
 detoxification and abstinence from the abused substance.

(7) The program shall conduct an exit conference that assesses the defendant’s progress during the defendant’s participation in the batterer’s program.

(d) An act or omission relating to the approval of a batterer’s treatment programs under paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) is a discretionary act pursuant to Section 820.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 538, Sec. 7.   (AB 2907)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.098.

(a) Unless otherwise provided, a person who works as a facilitator in a batterers’ intervention program that provides programs for batterers pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1203.097 shall complete the following requirements before being eligible to work as a facilitator in a batterers’ intervention program:

(1) Forty hours of basic core training. A minimum of eight hours of this instruction shall be provided by a shelter-based or shelter-approved trainer. The core curriculum shall include the following components:

(A) A minimum of eight hours in basic domestic violence knowledge focusing on victim safety and the role of domestic violence shelters in
 a community-coordinated response.

(B) A minimum of eight hours in multicultural, cross-cultural, and multiethnic diversity and domestic violence.

(C) A minimum of four hours in substance abuse and domestic violence.

(D) A minimum of four hours in intake and assessment, including the history of violence and the nature of threats and substance abuse.

(E) A minimum of eight hours in group content areas focusing on gender roles and socialization, the nature of violence, the dynamics of power and control, and the effects of abuse on children and others as required by Section 1203.097.

(F) A minimum of four hours in group facilitation.

(G) A minimum of four hours in domestic violence and the law, ethics, all requirements specified by the probation department pursuant to Section 1203.097, and the role of batterers’ intervention programs in a coordinated-community response.

(H) Any person that provides documentation of coursework, or equivalent training, that he or she has satisfactorily completed, shall be exempt from that part of the training that was covered by the satisfactorily completed coursework.

(I) The coursework that this person performs shall count toward the continuing education requirement.

(2) Fifty-two weeks or no less than 104 hours in six months, as a trainee in an approved batterers’ intervention program with a minimum of a two-hour group each week. A training program shall include at least one of the following:

(A) Cofacilitation internship in which an experienced facilitator is present in the room during the group session.

(B) Observation by a trainer of the trainee conducting a group session via a one-way mirror.

(C) Observation by a trainer of the trainee conducting a group session via a video or audio recording.

(D) Consultation or supervision twice a week in a six-month program or once a week in a 52-week program.

(3) An experienced facilitator is one who has the following qualifications:

(A) Documentation on file, approved by the agency, evidencing that the experienced facilitator has the skills needed to provide quality
 supervision and training.

(B) Documented experience working with batterers for three years, and a minimum of two years working with batterers’ groups.

(C) Documentation by January 1, 2003, of coursework or equivalent training that demonstrates satisfactory completion of the 40-hour basic core training.

(b) A facilitator of a batterers’ intervention program shall complete, as a minimum continuing education requirement, 16 hours annually of continuing education in either domestic violence or a related field with a minimum of eight hours in domestic violence.

(c) A person or agency with a specific hardship may request the probation department, in writing, for an extension of time to complete the training or to complete alternative training options.

(d) (1) An experienced facilitator, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), is not subject to the supervision requirements of this section, if he or she meets the requirements of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(2) This section does not apply to a person who provides batterers’ treatment through a jail education program if the person in charge of that program determines that the person providing treatment has adequate education or training in domestic violence or a related field.

(e) A person who satisfactorily completes the training requirements of a county probation department whose training program is equivalent to or exceeds the training requirements of this act shall be exempt from the training requirements of this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 165.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.099.

(a) The Counties of Napa, Sacramento, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, and Yolo may offer a program for individuals convicted of domestic violence that does not comply with the requirement of the batterer’s program in Sections 1203.097 and 1203.098 if the program meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The county develops the program in consultation with the domestic violence service providers and other relevant community partners.

(2) The county performs a risk and needs assessment utilizing an assessment demonstrated to be appropriate for domestic violence
 offenders for each offender entering the program.

(3) The offender’s treatment within the program is based on the findings of the risk and needs assessment.

(4) The program includes components which are evidence-based or promising practices.

(5) The program has a comprehensive written curriculum that informs the operations of the program and outlines the treatment and intervention modalities.

(6) The offender’s treatment within the program is for not less than one year in length, unless an alternative length is established by a validated risk and needs assessment completed by the probation department or an organization approved by the probation department.

(7) The county collects all of
 the following data for participants in the program:

(A) The offender’s demographic information, including age, gender, race, ethnicity, marital status, familial status, and employment status.

(B) The offender’s criminal history.

(C) The offender’s risk level as determined by the risk and needs assessment.

(D) The treatment provided to the offender during the program and if the offender completed that treatment.

(E) The offender’s outcome at the time of program completion, and six months after completion, including subsequent restraining order violations, arrests and convictions, and feedback provided by the victim if the victim desires to participate.

(8) The county reports all of the following information annually to the Legislature:

(A) The risk and needs assessment tool used for the program.

(B) The curriculum used by each program.

(C) The number of participants with a program length other than one year, and the alternative program lengths used.

(D) Individual data on the number of offenders participating in the program.

(E) Individual data for the items described in paragraph (7).

(b) Offenders who complete a program described in subdivision (a) shall be deemed to have met the batterer’s program requirements
 set forth in Section 1203.097.

(c) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Evidence-based program or practice” means a program or practice that has a high level of research indicating its effectiveness, determined as a result of multiple rigorous evaluations including randomized controlled trials and evaluations that incorporate strong comparison group designs, or a single large multisite randomized study, and, typically, has specified procedures that allow for successful replication.

(2) “Promising program or practice” means a program or practice that has some research demonstrating its effectiveness but does not meet the full criteria for an evidence-based designation.

(d) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (8)
 of subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 37, Sec. 1.   (AB 1549)   Effective June 30, 2026.   Repealed as of July 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.1.

(a) The court, or judge thereof, in the order granting probation, may suspend the imposing or the execution of the sentence and may direct that the suspension may continue for a period of time not exceeding two years, and upon those terms and conditions as it shall determine. The court, or judge thereof, in the order granting probation and as a condition thereof, may imprison the defendant in a county jail for a period not exceeding the maximum time fixed by law in the case. The following shall apply to this subdivision:

(1) The court may fine the defendant in a sum not to exceed the maximum fine provided by law in the case.

(2) The court may, in connection with granting
 probation, impose either imprisonment in a county jail or a fine, both, or neither.

(3) The court shall provide for restitution in proper cases. The restitution order shall be fully enforceable as a civil judgment forthwith and in accordance with Section 1202.4 of the Penal Code.

(4) The court may require bonds for the faithful observance and performance of any or all of the conditions of probation.

(b) The court shall consider whether the defendant as a condition of probation shall make restitution to the victim or the Restitution Fund. Any restitution payment received by a court or probation department in the form of cash or money order shall be forwarded to the victim within 30 days from the date the payment is received by the department. Any restitution payment received by a court or probation department in the
 form of a check or draft shall be forwarded to the victim within 45 days from the date the payment is received, provided, that payment need not be forwarded to a victim until 180 days from the date the first payment is received, if the restitution payments for that victim received by the court or probation department total less than fifty dollars ($50). In cases where the court has ordered the defendant to pay restitution to multiple victims and where the administrative cost of disbursing restitution payments to multiple victims involves a significant cost, any restitution payment received by a probation department shall be forwarded to multiple victims when it is cost effective to do so, but in no event shall restitution disbursements be delayed beyond 180 days from the date the payment is received by the probation department.

(c) In counties or cities and counties where road camps, farms, or other public work is available the court may place
 the probationer in the road camp, farm, or other public work instead of in jail. In this case, Section 25359 of the Government Code shall apply to probation and the court shall have the same power to require adult probationers to work, as prisoners confined in the county jail are required to work, at public work. Each county board of supervisors may fix the scale of compensation of the adult probationers in that county.

(d) In all cases of probation the court may require as a condition of probation that the probationer go to work and earn money for the support of the probationer’s dependents or to pay any fine imposed or reparation condition, to keep an account of the probationer’s earnings, to report them to the probation officer and apply those earnings as directed by the court.

(e) The court shall also consider whether the defendant as a condition of probation shall make
 restitution to a public agency for the costs of an emergency response pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 53150) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Government Code.

(f) In all felony cases in which, as a condition of probation, a judge of the superior court sitting by authority of law elsewhere than at the county seat requires a convicted person to serve their sentence at intermittent periods the sentence may be served on the order of the judge at the city jail nearest to the place at which the court is sitting, and the cost of the convicted person’s maintenance shall be a county charge.

(g) (1) The court and prosecuting attorney shall consider whether any defendant who has been convicted of a nonviolent or nonserious offense and ordered to participate in community service as a condition of probation shall be required to engage in the
 removal of graffiti in the performance of the community service. For the purpose of this subdivision, a nonserious offense shall not include the following:

(A) Offenses in violation of the Dangerous Weapons Control Law, as defined in Section 23500.

(B) Offenses involving the use of a dangerous or deadly weapon, including all violations of Section 417.

(C) Offenses involving the use or attempted use of violence against the person of another or involving injury to a victim.

(D) Offenses involving annoying or molesting children.

(2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), any person who violates Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 29610) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6 shall be
 ordered to perform not less than 100 hours and not more than 500 hours of community service as a condition of probation.

(3) The court and the prosecuting attorney need not consider a defendant pursuant to paragraph (1) if the following circumstances exist:

(A) The defendant was convicted of any offense set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 or subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7.

(B) The judge believes that the public safety may be endangered if the person is ordered to do community service or the judge believes that the facts or circumstances or facts and circumstances call for imposition of a more substantial penalty.

(h) The probation officer or their designated representative shall consider whether any defendant who has been convicted of a
 nonviolent and nonserious offense and ordered to participate in community service as a condition of probation shall be required to engage in the performance of house repairs or yard services for senior citizens and the performance of repairs to senior centers through contact with local senior service organizations in the performance of the community service.

(i) (1) Upon conviction of any offense involving child abuse or neglect, the court may require, in addition to any or all of the terms of imprisonment, fine, and other reasonable conditions specified in this section, that the defendant participate in counseling or education programs, or both, including, but not limited to, parent education or parenting programs operated by community colleges, school districts, other public agencies, or private agencies.

(2) Upon conviction of any sex offense subjecting
 the defendant to the registration requirements of Section 290, the court may order as a condition of probation, at the request of the victim or in the court’s discretion, that the defendant stay away from the victim and the victim’s residence or place of employment, and that the defendant have no contact with the victim in person, by telephone or electronic means, or by mail.

(j) The court may impose and require any or all of the terms of imprisonment, fine, and conditions specified in this section, and other reasonable conditions, as it may determine are fitting and proper to the end that justice may be done, that amends may be made to society for the breach of the law, for any injury done to any person resulting from that breach, and generally and specifically for the reformation and rehabilitation of the probationer, and that should the probationer violate any of the terms or conditions imposed by the court in the matter, it shall have
 authority to modify and change any and all the terms and conditions and to reimprison the probationer in the county jail within the limitations of the penalty of the public offense involved. Upon the defendant being released from the county jail under the terms of probation as originally granted or any modification subsequently made, and in all cases where confinement in a county jail has not been a condition of the grant of probation, the court shall place the defendant or probationer in and under the charge of the probation officer of the court, for the period or term fixed for probation. However, upon the payment of any fine imposed and the fulfillment of all conditions of probation, probation shall cease at the end of the term of probation, or sooner, in the event of modification. In counties and cities and counties in which there are facilities for taking fingerprints, those of each probationer shall be taken and a record of them kept and preserved.

(k) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, except as provided in Section 13967, as operative on or before September 28, 1994, of the Government Code and Section 13967.5 of the Government Code and Sections 1202.4, 1463.16, paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1463.18, and Section 1464, and Section 1203.04, as operative on or before August 2, 1995, all fines collected by a county probation officer in any of the courts of this state, as a condition of the granting of probation or as a part of the terms of probation, shall be paid into the county treasury and placed in the general fund for the use and benefit of the county.

(l) The two-year probation limit in subdivision (a) shall not apply to:

(1) An offense listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 and an offense that includes specific probation lengths within its provisions. For
 these offenses, the court, or judge thereof, in the order granting probation, may suspend the imposing or the execution of the sentence and may direct that the suspension may continue for a period of time not exceeding the maximum possible term of the sentence and under conditions as it shall determine. All other provisions of subdivision (a) shall apply.

(2) A felony conviction for paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 487, Section 503, and Section 532a, if the total value of the property taken exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). For these offenses, the court, or judge thereof, in the order granting probation, may suspend the imposing or the execution of the sentence and may direct that the suspension may continue for a period of time not exceeding three years, and upon those terms and conditions as it shall determine. All other provisions of subdivision (a) shall apply.

(m) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 21) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 257, Sec. 22.   (AB 177)   Effective September 23, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.1a.

The probation officer of the county may authorize the temporary removal under custody or temporary release without custody of any inmate of the county jail, honor farm, or other detention facility, who is confined or committed as a condition of probation, after suspension of imposition of sentence or suspension of execution of sentence, for purposes preparatory to his return to the community, within 30 days prior to his release date, if he concludes that such an inmate is a fit subject therefor. Any such temporary removal shall not be for a period of more than three days. When an inmate is released for purposes preparatory to his return to the community, the probation officer may require the inmate to reimburse the county, in whole or in part, for expenses incurred by the county in connection therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1357.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.1ab.

(a) Upon conviction of any offense involving the unlawful possession, use, sale, or other furnishing of any controlled substance, as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code, in addition to any or all of the terms of imprisonment, fine, and other reasonable conditions specified in or permitted by Section 1203.1, unless it makes a finding that this condition would not serve the interests of justice, the court, when recommended by the probation officer, shall require as a condition of probation that the defendant shall not use or be under the influence of any controlled substance and shall submit to drug and substance abuse testing as directed by the probation officer.

(b) This section
 shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 23) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 257, Sec. 24.   (AB 177)   Effective September 23, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.1bb.

(a) If a defendant is granted probation and ordered to install an ignition interlock device, the defendant shall be required to pay the cost of purchasing and installing an ignition interlock device pursuant to Section 13386 of the Vehicle Code. The cost shall be determined pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 23575.3 of the Vehicle Code. Any defendant subject to this section shall pay the manufacturer of the ignition interlock device directly for the cost of its purchase and installation, in accordance with the payment schedule ordered by the court. If practicable, the court shall order payment to be made to the manufacturer of the ignition interlock device within a six-month period.

(b) This section does not require any county to pay
 the costs of purchasing and installing any ignition interlock devices ordered pursuant to Section 13386 of the Vehicle Code. The Office of Traffic Safety shall consult with the presiding judge or the presiding judge’s designee in each county to determine an appropriate means, if any, to provide for installation of ignition interlock devices in cases in which the defendant has no ability to pay.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 48) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 92, Sec. 49.   (AB 1869)   Effective September 18, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.1d.

(a) In determining the amount and manner of disbursement under an order made pursuant to this code requiring a defendant to make reparation or restitution to a victim of a crime, to pay any cost of jail or other confinement, or to pay any other reimbursable costs, the court, after determining the amount of any fine and penalty assessments, and a county financial evaluation officer when making a financial evaluation, shall first determine the amount of restitution to be ordered paid to any victim, and shall determine the amount of the other reimbursable costs.

If payment is made in full, the payment shall be apportioned and disbursed in the amounts ordered by the court.

If reasonable and compatible with the defendant’s
 financial ability, the court may order payments to be made in installments.

(b) With respect to installment payments and amounts collected by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 19280 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and subsequently transferred by the Controller pursuant to Section 19282 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the board of supervisors shall provide that disbursements be made in the following order of priority:

(1) Restitution ordered to, or on behalf of, the victim pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1202.4.

(2) The state surcharge ordered pursuant to Section 1465.7.

(3) Any fines, penalty assessments, and restitution fines ordered pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1202.4. Payment of each of these items shall be made on a
 proportional basis to the total amount levied for all of these items.

(4) Any other reimbursable costs.

(c) The board of supervisors shall apply these priorities of disbursement to orders or parts of orders in cases where defendants have been ordered to pay more than one court order.

(d) Documentary evidence, such as bills, receipts, repair estimates, insurance payment statements, payroll stubs, business records, and similar documents relevant to the value of the stolen or damaged property, medical expenses, and wages and profits lost shall not be excluded as hearsay evidence.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 50) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 92, Sec. 51.   (AB 1869)   Effective September 18, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.1f.

If practicable, the court shall consolidate the ability to pay determination hearings authorized by this code into one proceeding, and the determination of ability to pay made at the consolidated hearing may be used for all purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.1g.

In any case in which a defendant is convicted of sexual assault on a minor, and the defendant is eligible for probation, the court, as a condition of probation, shall order him or her to make restitution for the costs of medical or psychological treatment incurred by the victim as a result of the assault and that he or she seek and maintain employment and apply that portion of his or her earnings specified by the court toward those costs.

As used in this section, “sexual assault” has the meaning specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 11165.1. The defendant is entitled to a hearing concerning any modification of the amount of restitution based on the costs of medical and psychological treatment incurred by the victim subsequent to the issuance of the order of probation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 168.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.1h.

(a) In addition to any other costs which a court is authorized to require a defendant to pay, upon conviction of any offense involving child abuse or neglect, the court may require that the defendant pay to a law enforcement agency incurring the cost, the cost of any medical examinations conducted on the victim in order to determine the nature or extent of the abuse or neglect. If the court determines that the defendant has the ability to pay all or part of the medical examination costs, the court may set the amount to be reimbursed and order the defendant to pay that sum to the law enforcement agency in the manner in which the court believes reasonable and compatible with the defendant’s financial ability.
 In making a determination of whether a defendant has the ability to pay, the court shall take into account the amount of any fine imposed upon the defendant and any amount the defendant has been ordered to pay in restitution.
